Washington statutes.
RCW 7.36.090

Return—Attachment for refusal.

The sheriff or other person to whom the writ is directed shall make immediate return thereof, and if he or she refuse after due service to make return, the court shall enforce obedience by attachment.

[ 2011 c 336 s 191; Code 1881 s 673; 1877 p 139 s 676; 1869 p 157 s 613; 1854 p 213 s 441; RRS s 1071.]